Utah statutes.
9-8-405.   Federal funds -- Agreements on standards and procedures.

By following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures, the division may accept and administer federal funds provided under the provisions of the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966, the Land and Water Conservation Act as amended, and subsequent legislation directed toward the encouragement of historic preservation, and to enter into those agreements on professional standards and procedures required by participation in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 and the National Register Office.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

